South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4688.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-2-90(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) Each golf cart passenger that is under the age of twelve years old, when it is being operated on the public streets and highways of this State, must wear a fastened safety belt. This subsection does not apply to a passenger of a golf cart owned by a golf course and being operated in conjunction with playing golf on the same course. SECTION 2.  Section 56-2-90 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (F)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a golf cart may be operated along a primary highway, secondary highway street, or road within a one-half mile radius of a Division I collegiate athletic event, or an event at a coliseum or arena that can hold a capacity of at least nineteen thousand individuals, for a period of three hours before the event commences until one hour after the event ends provided: (a) a law enforcement agency is controlling traffic during such athletic event; and (b) the golf cart and the person operating the golf cart are in compliance with subsections (A), (B), and (E). (2) A golf cart operated at night pursuant to this subsection must operate with working headlights and taillights. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----